Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB579.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 5502XD (1) 91 sc/ns S.F. _____ H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 70A.24, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. A state employee entitled to leave under the federal 3 Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993 shall be provided paid 4 leave for such time as specified in this section for the birth 5 of a child or placement of a child for adoption with the 6 employee if the leave is taken within twelve months following 7 any such birth or adoption. 8